Louisiana, session 2026, HB177.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 42:1121(B)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §1121. Assistance to certain persons after termination of public service
8 * * *
9 B.
10 * * *
11 (4) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a former official court reporter from
12 rendering services on a contractual basis to or for his former public employer.
13 * * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.